Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 23 Coastal Resources Management Council

46-23-1.
Legislative findings.

Under article 1, § 17 of the Rhode Island Constitution, the people shall continue to enjoy and freely exercise all the rights of fishery, and the privileges of the shore, to which they have been heretofore entitled under the charter and usages of this state, including, but not limited to, fishing from the shore, the gathering of seaweed, leaving the shore to swim in the sea and passage along the shore; and they shall be secure in their rights to use and enjoyment of the natural resources of the state with due regard for the preservation of their values; and it is the duty of the general assembly to provide for the conservation of the air, land, water, plant, animal, mineral and other natural resources of the state, and to adopt all means necessary and proper by law to protect the natural environment of the people of the state by providing adequate resource planning for the control and regulation of the use of the natural resources of the state and for the preservation, regeneration, and restoration of the natural environment of the state.

The general assembly recognizes and declares that the coastal resources of Rhode Island, a rich variety of natural, commercial, industrial, recreational, and aesthetic assets, are of immediate and potential value to the present and future development of this state; that unplanned or poorly planned development of this basic natural environment has already damaged or destroyed, or has the potential of damaging or destroying, the state’s coastal resources, and has restricted the most efficient and beneficial utilization of these resources; that it shall be the policy of this state to preserve, protect, develop, and, where possible, restore the coastal resources of the state for this and succeeding generations through comprehensive and coordinated long range planning and management designed to produce the maximum benefit for society from these coastal resources; and that preservation and restoration of ecological systems shall be the primary guiding principle upon which environmental alteration of coastal resources will be measured, judged, and regulated.

That effective implementation of these policies is essential to the social and economic well-being of the people of Rhode Island because the sea and its adjacent lands are major sources of food and public recreation, because these resources are used by and for industry, transportation, waste disposal, and other purposes, and because the demands made on these resources are increasing in number, magnitude, and complexity; and that these policies are necessary to protect the public health, safety, and general welfare. Pursuant to 16 U.S.C. § 1452 (“The Coastal Zone Management Act”), the general assembly hereby directs the council (referred to as “CRMC”) to exercise effectively its responsibilities in the coastal zone through the development and implementation of management programs to achieve wise use of the land and water resources of the coastal zone.

Furthermore, that implementation of these policies is necessary in order to secure the rights of the people of Rhode Island to the use and enjoyment of the natural resources of the state with due regard for the preservation of their values, and in order to allow the general assembly to fulfill its duty to provide for the conservation of the air, land, water, plant, animal, mineral, and other natural resources of the state, and to adopt all means necessary and proper by law to protect the natural environment of the people of the state by providing adequate resource planning for the control and regulation of the use of the natural resources of the state and for the preservation, regeneration, and restoration of the natural environment of the state.

That these policies can best be achieved through the creation of a coastal resources management council as the principal mechanism for management of the state’s coastal resources.

The general assembly recognizes and declares that maintenance dredging is required to remove natural silt accumulations; Rhode Island has not had a general maintenance dredging policy and programs for ports, port facilities, channels, harbors, public and private marinas and boating facilities, recreational facilities and habitat areas; other major coastal states have maintenance dredging policies and in-water maintenance dredge disposal sites; as a result of the lack of a general maintenance dredging policy and program and as a result there has been:

A decrease in the depth of the Providence Channel from forty-four (44) feet in 1971 to twenty-four (24) feet in 1996;

Navigational restrictions on ocean going vessels through the state’s waterways and channels; and

A decrease in the number of available slips and moorings at marinas throughout the state; and the lack of a maintenance dredging policy and programs have significant adverse environmental and economic effects on the state and therefore it is in the best interest of the state, the cities and towns of the state, and the citizens thereof for the state to have a general maintenance dredging policy and programs to resolve issues related to dredge maintenance and disposal and avoid future significant direct and indirect adverse impact on the environment and economy of the state.

The coastal resources management council is hereby designated as the lead state agency for purposes of dredging in tidal waters and as such shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To coordinate the interest of the state with regard to dredging;

To formulate and adopt a state policy with regard to dredging which integrates those interests;

To cooperate with, negotiate, and to enter into agreements on behalf of the state with the federal government and with other public bodies and private parties with regard to dredging;

To act as the initial and primary point of contact for all applications to the state for dredging projects in tidal waters;

To develop, prepare, adopt pursuant to §

46-23-11

, implement, and maintain a comprehensive plan for dredge material management; and

To cooperate and coordinate with the departments of environmental management, transportation, administration, and health, and the economic development corporation in the conduct of these duties and responsibilities.

The legislature recognizes that under Article I, § 17, the submerged lands of the state are impressed with a public trust and that the state is responsible for the protection of the public’s interest in these lands. The state maintains title in fee to all soil within its boundaries that lies below the high water mark, and it holds that land in trust for the use of the public. In benefiting the public, the state preserves certain public rights which include, but are not limited to, fishery, commerce, and navigation in these waters and the submerged lands that they cover.

Since its establishment in 1971, the CRMC has had the authority to manage and plan for the preservation of the coastal resources of the state including, but not limited to, submerged lands. The legislature hereby declares that, in light of the unique size, scope, and overall potential impact upon the environment of large scale filling projects involving twenty-five (25) acres or more, any lease of tidal lands, or any license to use those lands, is subject to approval, disapproval, or conditional approval by the direct enactment of the general assembly by legislative action. The CRMC shall review all requests for leases, licenses to use the land, and other authority to use the land made by any applicant prior to presentation of the request to the general assembly, and the CRMC shall make recommendations on the request to the general assembly. With the exception of any and all projects to fill land of twenty-five (25) acres or more, the general assembly hereby recognizes and declares that the CRMC is delegated the sole and exclusive authority for the leasing of submerged and filled lands and giving licenses for the use of that land. Accordingly, the CRMC will develop, coordinate, and adopt a system for the leasing of submerged and filled lands, and licenses for the use of that land, and will ensure that all leases and licenses are consistent with the public trust. Pursuant thereto, the CRMC shall impose a maximum fee of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) per annum for any transatlantic cable that makes landfall in Rhode Island. All such fees collected shall be deposited into the Bays, Rivers and Watersheds Fund, established pursuant to §

46-31-12.1

, and shall be disbursed according to the purposes of that fund. Nothing contained in this subsection negates, repeals, or alters the provisions, processes, and requirements for the leasing of submerged land for the conduct of aquaculture as set out under chapter 10 of title 20. Therefore, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or impair the authority of the state, or any duly established agency of the state, to regulate filling or dredging affecting tidal lands owned by the state or any other entity, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or impair the obligation of the applicant to obtain all applicable regulatory approvals. Specifically, and without limiting the foregoing, nothing in this subsection negates, repeals, or alters the provisions, processes, and requirements for water quality certification contained in chapter 12 of this title.

Definitions.

“Filled land” means portions of tidal lands which have been rendered by the acts of man to be no longer subject to tidal action or beneath tidal waters.

“Tidal Lands” means those lands that are below the mean high water.

“Mean high water” means a line of contour representing the 18.6 year average as determined by the metonic cycle and/or its equivalent as evidenced by the records, tidal datum, and methodology of the United States Coastal Geodetic Survey within the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 314, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 30, § 3.

46-23-2.
Coastal resources management council created — Appointment of members.

There is hereby created the coastal resources management council. The coastal resources management council shall consist of ten (10) members. Nine (9) members shall be appointed by the governor, with advice and consent of the senate, and one member shall serve ex officio. All current appointments to the coastal resources management council made by the governor with advice and consent of the senate are hereby validated and ratified and those appointees shall serve for the remainder of their term.

Six (6) of the members shall be appointed or elected officials of local government: three (3) of whom shall be appointed or elected officials in a municipality of fewer than twenty-five thousand (25,000) in population, three (3) of whom shall be appointed or elected officials in a municipality of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) in population. The populations are to be determined by the latest federal census. Elected or appointed municipal officials shall hold seats on the council only so long as they remain in their elected or appointed office. Each municipal appointment shall cease if the appointed or elected official shall no longer hold or change the office which they held upon appointment. At least five (5) out of the six (6) appointed or elected members must be appointed or elected in a coastal municipality. When the governor submits his or her appointments to the senate for advice and consent, the governor shall specify the appointed or elected office that each municipal appointment holds; the population of the municipality represented; and the member being replaced.

Three (3) members shall be appointed by the governor from the public, with the advice and consent of the senate, one of the public members and his or her successors shall reside in a coastal municipality.

All members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified; during the month of January, the governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a member to succeed the members whose term will then next expire for a term of three (3) years commencing on the first day of February next following and until their successor is named and qualified. A member shall be eligible for successive appointments. No more than two (2) persons on the council shall be from the same municipality. A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term.

The director of the department of environmental management, or their designee, shall serve ex officio. The ex-officio member shall not be counted as serving from any particular municipality.

In addition to the foregoing voting members, the council may include a varying number of other members who may serve in an advisory capacity without the right to vote and who may be invited to serve by either the governor or the voting members. These advisory members may represent the federal agencies such as the navy, coast guard, corps of engineers, public health service, and the Federal Water Pollution Control Administration, and such regional agencies as the New England River Basins Commission and the New England Regional Commission and any other group or interest not otherwise represented.

There may be established a coastal resources advisory committee which committee, appointed by the executive director of the coastal resources management council, may include, but not be limited to, representation from the following groups: one of whom may be a representative of the university of Rhode Island graduate school of oceanography and the college of resources development, one of whom may be a representative of the Sea Grant National College Program, one of whom may be a representative of the army corps of engineers, one of whom may be a representative of the federal environmental protection agency’s Narragansett Bay laboratory, one of whom shall be a representative of the coastal resources management council, one of whom may be the director of the department of environmental management; one of whom may be a member of the Rhode Island Marine Trade Association and one of whom may be a representative of a regional environmental group. The council shall have the authority to appoint these additional members to the advisory committee as is deemed necessary or advisable by the advisory committee or the council. It shall be the responsibility of the committee to advise the coastal resources management council on environmental issues relating to dredging and permitting related thereto, including, but not limited to, those issues defined in §§

46-23-18.1

—

46-23-18.3

, inclusive.

The council shall have the authority to form committees of other advisory groups as needed from both its own members and others.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 271, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 281, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 457, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 354, § 54; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 155; P.L. 2018, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 99, § 1.

46-23-2.1.
Members — Term of office — Vacancies.

The term of office of the appointed members shall be three (3) years, only so long as the members shall remain eligible to serve on the council under the appointment authority.

The members are eligible for successive appointments.

Elected or appointed municipal officials shall hold seats on the council, only so long as they remain in their elected or appointed office.

A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term. The governor shall have the power to remove his or her appointee for just cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10; P.L. 1999, ch. 354, § 54; P.L. 2018, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 99, § 1.

46-23-3.
Oath of members.

Each appointed member of the council, before entering upon his or her duties, shall take an oath to administer the duties of his or her office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1.

46-23-4.
Officers of the council — Quorum and vote required for action.

The governor shall select from the appointed members a chairperson and vice chairperson. The council shall thereupon select a secretary from among its membership or staff. The council may engage staff, including legal counsel, as it deems necessary. A quorum shall consist of six (6) members of the council. A majority vote of those present shall be required for action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10; P.L. 2018, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 99, § 1.

46-23-4.1.
The commissioner of coastal resources management.

The council shall engage a commissioner of coastal resources management who shall be an employee of the council and who shall not be a member of the council. The commissioner shall coordinate and liaison with the director of the department of environmental management, and his or her staff shall be at the same staff level as the other commissioners and shall work directly with the other commissioners. The commissioner of coastal resources management shall be in the unclassified service. The duties and powers of the commissioner of coastal resources management shall be determined by the council. The council shall not engage a commissioner of coastal resources management for more than five (5) years; provided, however, that the council may renew its contract with the commissioner of coastal resources management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 212, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 10.

46-23-5.
Expenses of members.

The members of the council and the chairperson shall not be compensated for their service on the board, but the members and chairperson shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.

[Deleted by P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 34.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 34.